Georgia, session 2025_26, HB421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Interstate Sexual Predator Prevention Act."
SECTION 2.
Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to crimes and offenses, is
amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"16-6-4.1.
(a) A person commits the offense of traveling to meet a child for indecent purposes when
such person travels any distance into this state from outside this state, or causes another
person to do so, for the purpose of contacting any child under the age of 16 years, or with
a person believed to be a child under the age of 16 years, to:
H. B. 421
- 1 -

LC 48 1448
(1) Solicit, entice, or commit any act of child molestation or other indecent act; or
(2) Solicit or entice any parent, guardian, or other lawful custodian of any child, or to
solicit or entice any person believed to be a parent, guardian, or other lawful custodian
of any child, to consent to or otherwise allow the participation of any child in any act of
child molestation or other indecent act.
(b)(1) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code
section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than
two years nor more than ten years and shall be subject to the sentencing and punishment
provisions of Code Sections 17-10-6.2 and 17-10-7.
(2) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code
section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than ten
years.
(3) Any person convicted of violating this Code section shall be subject to the provisions
of Code Section 42-1-12."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 421
- 2 -